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DTC P0 130/21 OxygenSensorCircuitMalfunction
(Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0 150/28OxygenSensorCircuitMalfunction
(Bank2Sensor 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Toobtainahighpurification rate for theCO,HCandNOxcomponentsof theexhaustgas,a three −way
catalyticconverter isused,but for themostefficientuseof the three −waycatalyticconverter, theair −fuel
ratiomustbepreciselycontrolledso that it isalwaysclose to thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio.
The oxygen sensor has the characteristic whereby its output voltage changes suddenly in the vicinity of the
stoichiometricair −fuel ratio.Thischaracteristic isused todetect theoxygenconcentration in theexhaust
gasandprovide feedback to thecomputer forcontrolof theair −fuel ratio.
When theair −fuel ratiobecomesLEAN, theoxygenconcentration in theexhaust increasesand theoxygen
sensor informs the engine ECU of the LEAN condition (small electromotive force: 0 V).
When theair −fuel ratio isRICHERthan thestoichiometricair −fuel ratio theoxygenconcentration in theex-
haust gas is reduced and the oxygen sensor informs the engine ECU of the RICH condition (large electromo-
tive force: 1 V).TheengineECUjudgesby theelectromotive force fromtheoxygensensorwhether theair −
fuel ratio is RICH or LEAN and controls the injection time accordingly. However, if malfunction of the oxygen
sensorcausesoutputofabnormalelectromotive force, theengineECUisunable toperformaccurateair −
fuel ratio control.
The oxygen sensors include a heater which heats the Zirconia element. The heater is controlled by the en-
gine ECU. When the intake air volume is low (the temperature of the exhaust gas is low) current flows to the
heater to heat the sensor for accurate oxygen concentration detection.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0130/21
P0150/28

After the engine is warmed up, oxygen sensor signal voltage is
reduced to between 0.35 V and 0.70 V for 60 sec. with under
conditions (a) and (b):
(a) Engine speed: 4,000 rpm or less
(b)Vehiclespeed: 100km/h (62mph)or less

SOxygensensor
SFuel trimmalfunction

HINT:
Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No.1.
Bank 2 refers to bank that does not include cylinder No.1.
Sensor 1 refers to the sensor closer to the engine body.
Theoxygensensor’soutputvoltageand theshort − termfuel trimvaluecanbereadusing the
hand− held tester.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(2) Switch the hand−held tester from normal mode to check (test) mode (See page DI−4) .
(3) Start the engine and warm it up with all accessory switches OFF.
(4)Drive thevehicleat50 � 65km/h (3 1 � 40mph) for 1 � 3min. towarmup theoxygensensor.
(5)Let theengine idle for 1 min.
(6) Perfom steps (3) to (5) three times.
HINT:
If a malfunction exists, the CHK ENG will be indicated on the multiinformation display during step (6).
NOTICE:
If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, detection of the malfunction will not be possible.
Ifyoudonothaveahand −held tester, turn the ignitionswitchOFFafterperformingsteps(3) to (6),
then perform steps (3) to (6) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Whenusinghand −held tester
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditionswhen
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −
fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the timeof themalfunction.

1 Checkforopenandshort inharnessandconnectorbetweenengineECUand
oxygen sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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2 Check for oxygen sensor data.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Warm up the engine to normal operating temperature.
CHECK:
Read the oxygen sensor output voltage and short−term fuel trim.
RESULT:

Pattern Oxygen sensor output voltage Short−term fuel trim

1 Lean condition (Changes at 0.55 V or less) Changes at about +20 %

2 Rich condition (Changes at 0.35 V or more) Changesatabout −20%

3 Except 1 and2

1, 2 Check fuel trim system (See page DI−61).

3

3 Check output voltage of oxygen sensor during idling.

PREPARATION:
Warm up the oxygen sensor with the engine at 2,500 rpm for approx. 90 sec.
CHECK:
Use thehand −held tester read theoutputvoltageof theoxygensensorduring idling.
OK:

Oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates repeatedly between less than 0.35 V and more than 0.70 V (See the following table).
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Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure waveform be-
tween terminals OXL1, OXR1 and E1 of the engine ECU .
HINT:
S The correct waveform is as shown oscillating between

approx. 0.1 V and 0.9 V.

S If the oxygen sensor has deteriorated, the amplitude of
the voltage will be reduced as shown on the left.

OK Perform confirmation driving pattern.

NG

Replace oxygen sensor.

When not using hand−held tester

1 Are there any other codes (besides code 21 and 28) being output?

YES Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI−1 7) .

NO

Replace oxygen sensor.
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Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
With the engine racing (4,000 rpm) measure waveform be-
tween terminals OXL1, OXR1 and E1 of the engine ECU .
HINT:
S The correct waveform is as shown oscillating between

approx. 0.1 V and 0.9 V.

S If the oxygen sensor has deteriorated, the amplitude of
the voltage will be reduced as shown on the left.


